Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-121
Domestic company; capital stock; failure to restore; proceedings authorized.

If the amount of any such impairment or deficiency shall not be made good within the time specified in such notice and proof thereof filed with the Department of Insurance, the company shall be proceeded against in the manner authorized and directed by the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 9, p. 400;

R.S.1913, § 3145;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 2, p. 578;

C.S.1922, § 7746;

C.S.1929, § 44-202;

R.S.1943, § 44-121;

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 63.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.